Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.040

Vouchers for pay and mileage of members—Warrants.

The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate are hereby directed to prepare vouchers for the state treasurer for the mileage and daily pay of members of the legislature on presentation of certificates showing amounts due for miles traveled and services rendered to dates specified. The certificates shall be signed by the speaker or president, and countersigned by the chief clerk or secretary, respectively, of the body to which the members belong. The state treasurer shall issue warrants which shall be in favor of and payable to the order of the persons named in said certificates.

[ 1973 c 106 s 17; 1890 p 6 s 1; RRS s 8150.]

NOTES:

Annual salary: RCW 43.03.010.

Mileage allowance: State Constitution Art. 2 s 23; RCW 43.03.010.